North Carolina statutes. Chapter 10A. Notaries. [Repealed]
§§ 10A-1 through 10A-17.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-391, s. 3, effective December 1, 2005, and applicable to notarial acts and applications for notary commissions and recommissions made on or after that date.

Cross References.

For notaries, see now

G.S. 10B-1

et seq.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2005-75, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006, and applicable to notary public applications filed on or after that date, amended G.S. 10A-4.

Session Laws 2005-328, s. 1, effective August 26, 2005, amended G.S. 10A-10.